Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,373
Standards; violations; penalty.

Every person who operates a diesel-powered or other motor vehicle in this state in violation of the standards established by sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor, and every day that the diesel-powered or other motor vehicle is so operated shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

Laws 1972, LB 1360, § 11;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 105;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2211;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 469.